Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1646.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.0685, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Credit allowed. (a) Annew text begin eligiblenew text end individual is allowed a credit against the tax imposed by this chapter equal to $2,000 for each deleted text begin birth for which a certificate of birth resulting in stillbirth has been issued under section 144.2151deleted text end new text begin stillbirthnew text end . The credit under this section is allowed only in the taxable year in which the stillbirth occurred deleted text begin and if the child would have been a dependent of the taxpayer as defined in section 152 of the Internal Revenue Codedeleted text end . (b) For a deleted text begin nonresident ordeleted text end part-year resident, the credit must be allocated based on the percentage calculated under section 290.06, subdivision 2c, paragraph (e). new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2015. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.0685, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Certificate of birth" means the printed certificate of birth resulting in stillbirth issued under section 144.2151, or for a birth occurring in another state or country a similar certificate issued under that state's or country's law. new text end new text begin (c) "Eligible individual" means an individual who is: new text end new text begin (1)(i) a resident; or new text end new text begin (ii) the nonresident spouse of a resident who is a member of the armed forces of the United States or the United Nations; and new text end new text begin (2)(i) the individual who gave birth resulting in stillbirth and is listed as a parent on the certificate of birth; or new text end new text begin (ii) the individual who gave birth resulting in stillbirth for a birth outside of this state for which no certificate of birth was issued. new text end new text begin (d) "Stillbirth" means a birth for which a fetal death report would be required under section 144.222, subdivision 1, if the birth occurred in this state. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2015. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin REFUNDS ALLOWED.new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 289A.40, subdivision 1, claims for refunds for credits allowed due to the amendments to Minnesota Statutes, section 290.0685, in sections 1 and 2 for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2015, and before January 1, 2022, may be filed until January 1, 2026. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end